Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2107
Certified master social work, defined.

Certified master social work means the specialized application of social work values, knowledge, principles, and methods in all areas of social work practice. Certified master social work may include the private, independent, and autonomous practice of social work.

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-1,249;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 19;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,300;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 726.